Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-185
Vehicle identification inspections; application for training; investigation; denial; grounds.

(1) Upon receipt of an application for training pursuant to section 60-184, the patrol may inquire into the qualifications of the applicant and may also inquire into the background of the applicant.

(2) The patrol shall not approve any applicant who has (a) knowingly purchased, sold, or done business in stolen vehicles or parts therefor, (b) been found guilty of any felony which has not been pardoned, been found guilty of any misdemeanor concerning fraud or conversion, or suffered any judgment in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion, or (c) made a false material statement in his or her application.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 85.